Utah statutes.
59-10-510.   Return of electing small business corporation.
An electing small business corporation, as defined in Section 1371(a)(2),
Internal Revenue Code, shall make a return for each taxable year, stating
specifically:
(1)  the items of the electing small business corporation's gross income and
the deductions allowable by Subtitle A, Internal Revenue Code;
(2)  the names and addresses of all persons owning stock in the electing small
business corporation at any time during the taxable year;
(3)  the number of shares of stock owned by each shareholder at all times
during the taxable year to each shareholder;
(4)  the date of each distribution to a shareholder; and
(5)  other information as the commission may prescribe by:
(a)  form; or
(b)  administrative rule made in accordance with Title 63G, Chapter 3, Utah
Administrative Rulemaking Act.
